Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 10. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 10.20.655.
Interrogatories by commissioner; certification to attorney general regarding violation.

The commissioner may propound to a domestic or foreign corporation and to an officer or director of a domestic or foreign corporation those interrogatories reasonably necessary and proper for ascertaining whether the corporation has complied with the provisions of this chapter.

The interrogatories shall be answered within 30 days after mailing, or within the additional time fixed by the commissioner, and the answers shall be full and complete, in writing and under penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree under AS

11.56.210

. If the interrogatories are directed to an individual, they shall be answered by that individual and, if directed to a corporation, they shall be answered by the president, vice-president, secretary, or assistant secretary of the corporation.

The commissioner need not file the document to which the interrogatories relate until the interrogatories are properly answered and need not then file the document if the answers disclose that the document does not conform to the provisions of this chapter.

The commissioner shall certify to the attorney general, for appropriate action, all interrogatories and answers that disclose a violation of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 38 ch 65 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Sec. 10.20.660.
Disclosure of interrogatories, answers, and information.

Interrogatories and answers are not open to public inspection and the commissioner may not disclose facts or information obtained from the interrogatories except as an official duty of the commissioner requires or if the interrogatories or the answers are required for evidence in criminal proceedings or other action by the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.665.
Notice of and appeal from disapproval of document.

If the commissioner fails to approve articles of incorporation, amendment, merger, consolidation, or dissolution, or any other document required by this chapter to be approved, the commissioner, within 10 days after delivery of the document to the commissioner, shall give written notice of disapproval to the person or corporation, domestic or foreign, delivering the document, specifying the reasons for disapproval.
The person or corporation may appeal from the disapproval to the superior court by filing with the clerk of the court a petition setting out a copy of the document sought to be filed and a copy of the written disapproval.
The matter shall be tried de novo by the superior court, which shall either sustain the action of the commissioner or direct the commissioner to take action the court considers proper.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.670.
Appeal from revocation of certificate of authority.

If the commissioner revokes the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in the state under this chapter, the foreign corporation may appeal to the superior court by filing with the clerk of the court a petition setting out a copy of its certificate of authority and a copy of the notice of revocation given by the commissioner.
The matter shall be tried de novo by the superior court, and the court shall either sustain the action of the commissioner or direct the commissioner to take action the court considers proper.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.673.
Cancellation of filings.

The provisions in AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) relating to the cancellation of certain corporate filings apply to nonprofit corporations.

History.

(§ 67 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporation Act (AS 10.05)” to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to cancellation of certificates and filings, see AS

10.06.865

.

Sec. 10.20.675.
Certificates and certified copies to be received in evidence.

Certificates issued by the commissioner in accordance with this chapter, and copies of documents filed in the commissioner’s office in accordance with the provisions of this chapter when certified by the commissioner, are prima facie evidence of the facts stated.
A certificate by the commissioner under the seal of the state as to the existence or nonexistence of facts relating to corporations that do not appear from a certified copy of these documents or certificates is prima facie evidence of the existence or nonexistence of the facts stated.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.680.
Use of forms furnished by the commissioner.

All reports required by this chapter to be filed with the department or the commissioner must be on forms prescribed and furnished by the commissioner.
Forms for all other documents to be filed in the office of the department or the commissioner shall be furnished by the commissioner on request, but their use, unless required in this chapter, is not mandatory.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.685.
Greater voting or concurrence requirements.

When, with respect to any action to be taken by the members or directors of a corporation, the articles of incorporation or bylaws require the vote or concurrence of a greater proportion of the directors or members or any class of members than required by this chapter, the provisions of the articles of incorporation or bylaws control.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.690.
Waiver of notice.

When notice is required to be given to a member or director of a corporation under the provisions of this chapter or under the provisions of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, a waiver of the notice in writing signed by the person entitled to notice, whether before or after the time stated for notice, is equivalent to the giving of notice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989 the term “member” was substituted for “shareholder” in this section to correct a manifest error in ch. 99, SLA 1968.

Sec. 10.20.695.
Action by members or directors without a meeting.

Action required by this chapter to be taken at a meeting of the members or directors of a corporation, or action that may be taken at a meeting of the members or directors, may be taken without a meeting if a consent in writing, setting out the action so taken, shall be signed by all of the members entitled to vote with respect to the subject matter or all of the directors.

The consent has the same effect as a unanimous vote, and may be stated as such in articles or documents filed with the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.700.
Unauthorized assumption of corporate powers.

Persons who assume to act as a corporation without authority are jointly and severally liable for debts and liabilities incurred or arising as a result of that action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)